District of Columbia statutes.
31-4712

Accident and sickness policies.

(a)

Filing requirements. —

No policy of insurance against loss resulting from sickness or from bodily injury or death by accident, or both, shall be issued or delivered to any person in the District by any company organized under this or any other law of the District, or, if a foreign or alien company, authorized to do business in the District, including, but not limited to, all Health Maintenance Organizations, Group Hospitalization and Medical Services, Inc., all life insurance companies licensed to do business in the District, and all for-profit as well as nonprofit health insurers issuing or delivering expense incurred accident and sickness health insurance policies and certificates, until a copy of the form thereof, and of the classification of risks and the premium rates appertaining thereto, have been filed with the Commissioner; nor shall it be so issued or delivered until the expiration of 30 days after it has been so filed, unless the Commissioner shall sooner give his written approval thereto. If the Commissioner shall give written notice to the company which has filed such form that it does not comply with the requirements of law, specifying the reasons for his opinion, it shall be unlawful thereafter for any such insurer to issue any policy in such form. Rates filed with respect to a policy or certificate subject to the Reasonable Health Insurance Ratemaking Reform Act of 2010 [Chapters 30A, 31C, and 33A of this title] shall also comply with the provisions of such act.

(b)

Form. —

(1)

No policy of accident and sickness insurance shall be delivered or issued for delivery to any person in the District unless:

(A)

The entire money and other considerations therefor are expressed therein;

(B)

The time at which the insurance takes effect and terminates is expressed therein;

(C)

It purports to insure only 1 person, except that a policy may insure, originally or by subsequent amendment, upon the application of an adult member of a family who shall be deemed the policyholder, any 2 or more eligible members of that family, including spouse, domestic partner, dependent children or any children under a specified age which shall not exceed 19 years and any other person dependent upon the policyholder;

(D)

The style, arrangement, and overall appearance of the policy give no undue prominence to any portion of the text, and unless every printed portion of the text of the policy and of any endorsements or attached papers is plainly printed in lightfaced type of a style in general use, the size of which shall be uniform and not less than 10-point with a lowercase unspaced alphabet length not less than 120-point (the text shall include all printed matter except the name and address of the insurer, name or title of the policy, the brief description, if any, and captions and subcaptions);

(E)

The exceptions and reductions of indemnity are set forth in the policy and, except those which are set forth in subsection (c) of this section, are printed, at the insurer’s option, either included with the benefit provision to which they apply, or under an appropriate caption such as “EXCEPTIONS,” or “EXCEPTIONS AND REDUCTIONS”; provided, that, if an exception or reduction specifically applies only to a particular benefit of the policy, a statement of such exception or reduction shall be included with the benefit provision to which it applies;

(F)

Each such form, including riders and endorsements, shall be identified by a former number in the lower left-hand corner of the 1st page thereof;

(G)

It contains no provision purporting to make any portion of the charter, rules, constitution, or bylaws of the insurer a part of the policy unless such portion is set forth in full in the policy, except in the case of the incorporation of, or reference to, a statement of rates or classification of risks, or short-rate table filed with the Commissioner;

(H)

It contains no provision which would restrict access to psychologists or optometrists. When a policy relating to health insurance requires payment or reimbursement for services which may be performed by a duly licensed psychologist or optometrist, any person covered by the policy shall be free to select and have direct access to such psychologist or optometrist without supervision or referral by a practitioner of the healing art and shall be entitled, under the policy, to have payment or reimbursement made for services performed;

(I)

For a policy issued or renewed after April 15, 1995, it contains a provision covering a minor grandchild, niece, or nephew of an employee of the District of Columbia if the minor grandchild, niece, or nephew is under the primary care of the insured, and if the legal guardian of the minor grandchild, niece, or nephew, if other than the insured, is not covered by an accident or sickness policy. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term “primary care” means that the insured provides food, clothing, and shelter, on a regular and continuous basis, for the minor grandchild, niece, or nephew during the time that the District of Columbia public schools are in regular session; and

(J)

For a policy issued or renewed after April 15, 1996, it contains a provision covering a minor grandchild, niece, or nephew under the primary care of the insured, and if the legal guardian of the minor grandchild, niece, or nephew, if other than the insured, is not covered by an accident or sickness policy. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term “primary care” means that the insured provides food, clothing, and shelter, on a regular and continuous basis, for the minor grandchild, niece, or nephew during the time that the District of Columbia public schools are in regular session.

(2)

If any policy is issued by an insurer domiciled in the District for delivery to a person residing in another jurisdiction, and if the official having responsibility for the administration of the insurance laws of such other jurisdiction shall have advised the Commissioner that any such policy is not subject to approval or disapproval by such official, the Commissioner may by ruling require that such policy meet the standards set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection and in subsection (c) of this section.

(c)

Provisions. —

(1)

Required provisions. —

Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection each such policy delivered or issued for delivery to any person in the District shall contain the provisions specified in this paragraph in the words in which the same appear in this paragraph; provided, however, that the insurer may, at its option, substitute for one or more of such provisions corresponding provisions of different wording approved by the Commissioner which are in each instance not less favorable in any respect to the insured or the beneficiary. Such provisions shall be preceded individually by the caption appearing in this paragraph or, at the option of the insurer, by such appropriate individual or group captions or subcaptions as the Commissioner may approve:

(A)

A provision as follows:

“ENTIRE CONTRACT; CHANGES: This policy, including the endorsements and the attached papers, if any, constitutes the entire contract of insurance. No change in this policy shall be valid until approved by an executive officer of the insurer and unless such approval be endorsed hereon or attached hereto. No agent has authority to change this policy or to waive any of its provisions.”.

(B)

(i)

A provision as follows:

“TIME LIMIT ON CERTAIN DEFENSES: After 3 years from the date of issue of this policy no misstatements, except fraudulent misstatements, made by the applicant in the application for such policy shall be used to void the policy or to deny a claim for loss incurred or disability (as defined in the policy) commencing after the expiration of such 3-year period.”.

(ii)

(The foregoing policy provision shall not be so construed as to affect any legal requirement for avoidance of a policy or denial of a claim during such initial 3-year period, nor to limit the application of subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), (D), and (E) of paragraph (2) of this subsection in the event of misstatement with respect to age or occupation or other insurance.)

(iii)

A policy which the insured has the right to continue in force subject to its terms by the timely payment of premium until at least age 50 or in the case of a policy issued after age 44, for at least 5 years from its date of issue; may contain in lieu of the foregoing the following provision (from which the clause in parentheses may be omitted at the insurer’s option) under the caption “INCONTESTABLE.”

“After this policy has been in force for a period of 3 years during the lifetime of the insured (excluding any period during which the insured has a disability), it shall become incontestable as to the statements contained in the application.”
“No claim for loss incurred or disability (as defined in the policy) commencing after 3 years from the date of issue of this policy shall be reduced or denied on the ground that a disease or physical condition not excluded from coverage by name or specific description effective on the date of loss had existed prior to the effective date of coverage of this policy.”

(C)

(i)

A provision as follows:

“GRACE PERIOD: A grace period of . . . . . . . . .(insert the last day of the month for which the premium is due for policies issued on a calendar month basis and a period not less than 31 days for all other policies) will be granted for the payment of each premium falling due after the 1st premium, during which grace period the policy shall continue in force.”.

(ii)

A policy which contains a cancellation provision may add, at the end of the above provision, “Subject to the right of the insurer to cancel in accordance with the cancellation provision hereof.”.

(iii)

A policy in which the insurer reserves the right to refuse any renewal shall have, at the beginning of the above provision;

“Unless not less than 5 days prior to the premium due date the insurer has delivered to the insured or has mailed to his last address as shown by the records of the insurer written notice of its intention not to renew this policy beyond the period for which the premium has been accepted.”.

(D)

(i)

A provision as follows:

“REINSTATEMENT: If any renewal premium be not paid within the time granted the insured for payment, a subsequent acceptance of premium by the insurer or by any agent duly authorized by the insurer to accept such premium, without requiring in connection therewith an application for reinstatement, shall reinstate the policy; provided, however, that if the insurer or such agent requires an application for reinstatement and issues a conditional receipt for the premium tendered, the policy will be reinstated upon approval of such application by the insurer, or, lacking such approval, upon the 45th day following the date of such conditional receipt unless the insurer has previously notified the insured in writing of its disapproval of such application. The reinstated policy shall cover only loss resulting from such accidental injury as may be sustained after the date of reinstatement and loss due to such sickness as may begin more than 10 days after such date. In all other respects the insured and insurer shall have the same rights thereunder as they had under the policy immediately before the due date of the defaulted premium, subject to any provisions endorsed hereon or attached hereto in connection with the reinstatement. Any premium accepted in connection with a reinstatement shall be applied to a period for which premium has not been previously paid, but not to any period more than 60 days prior to the date of reinstatement.”.

(ii)

The last sentence of the above provision may be omitted from any policy which the insured has the right to continue in force subject to its terms by the timely payment of premiums until at least age 50 or in the case of a policy issued after age 44, for at least 5 years from its date of issue.

(E)

(i)

A provision as follows:

“NOTICE OF CLAIM: Written notice of claim must be given to the insurer within 20 days after the occurrence or commencement of any loss covered by the policy, or as soon thereafter as is reasonably possible. Notice given by or on behalf of the insured or the beneficiary to the insurer at . . . . . . . . . . (insert the location of such office as the insurer may designate for the purpose), or to any authorized agent of the insurer, with information sufficient to identify the insured, shall be deemed notice to the insurer.”.

(ii)

In a policy providing a loss-of-time benefit which may be payable for at least 2 years, an insurer may at its option insert the following between the 1st and 2nd sentences of the above provision:

“Subject to the qualifications set forth below, if the insured suffers loss of time on account of disability for which indemnity may be payable for at least 2 years, he shall, at least once in every 6 months after having given notice of claim, give to the insurer notice of continuance of said disability, except in the event of legal incapacity. The period of 6 months following any filing of proof by the insured or any payment by the insurer on account of such claim or any denial of liability in whole or in part by the insurer shall be excluded in applying this provision. Delay in the giving of such notice shall not impair the insured’s right to any indemnity which would otherwise have accrued during the period of 6 months preceding the date on which such notice is actually given.”.

(F)

A provision as follows:

“CLAIM FORMS: The insurer, upon receipt of a notice of claim, will furnish to the claimant such forms as are usually furnished by it for filing proofs of loss. If such forms are not furnished within 15 days after the giving of such notice the claimant shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of this policy as to proof of loss upon submitting, within the time fixed in the policy for filing proofs of loss, written proof covering the occurrence, the character and the extent of the loss for which claim is made.”

(G)

A provision as follows:

“PROOFS OF LOSS: Written proof of loss must be furnished to the insurer at its said office in case of claim for loss for which this policy provides any periodic payment contingent upon continuing loss within 90 days after the termination of the period for which the insurer is liable and in case of claim for any other loss within 90 days after the date of such loss. Failure to furnish such proof within the time required shall not invalidate nor reduce any claim if it was not reasonably possible to give proof within such time, provided such proof is furnished as soon as reasonably possible and in no event, except in the absence of legal capacity, later than 1 year from the time proof is otherwise required.”.

(H)

A provision as follows:

“TIME OF PAYMENT OF CLAIMS: Indemnities payable under this policy for any loss other than loss for which this policy provides any periodic payment will be paid immediately upon receipt of due written proof of such loss. Subject to due written proof of loss, all accrued indemnities for loss for which this policy provides periodic payment will be paid . . . . . . . . . . (insert period for payment which must not be less frequently than monthly) and any balance remaining unpaid upon the termination of liability will be paid immediately upon receipt of due written proof.”.

(I)

(i)

A provision as follows:

“PAYMENT OF CLAIMS: Indemnity for loss of life will be payable in accordance with the beneficiary designation and the provisions respecting such payment which may be prescribed herein and effective at the time of payment. If no such designation or provision is then effective, such indemnity shall be payable to the estate of the insured. Any other accrued indemnities unpaid at the insured’s death may, at the option of the insurer, be paid either to such beneficiary or to such estate. All other indemnities will be payable to the insured.”.

(ii)

The following provisions, or either of them, may be included with the foregoing provision at the option of the insurer:

“If any indemnity of this policy shall be payable to the estate of the insured, or to an insured or beneficiary who is a minor or otherwise not competent to give a valid release, the insurer may pay such indemnity up to an amount not exceeding $. . . . . . . . . . (insert an amount which shall not exceed $1,000), to any relative by blood or connection by marriage or domestic partnership of the insured or beneficiary who is deemed by the insurer to be equitably entitled thereto. Any payment made by the insurer in good faith pursuant to this provision shall fully discharge the insurer to the extent of such payment.

“Subject to any written direction of the insured in the application or otherwise all or a portion of any indemnities provided by this policy on account of hospital, nursing, medical, or surgical services may, at the insurer’s option and unless the insured requests otherwise in writing not later than the time of filing proofs of such loss, be paid directly to the hospital or person rendering such services; but it is not required that the service be rendered by a particular hospital or person.”.

(J)

A provision as follows:

“PHYSICAL EXAMINATIONS AND AUTOPSY: The insurer at its own expense shall have the right and opportunity to examine the person of the insured when and as often as it may reasonably require during the pendency of a claim hereunder and to make an autopsy in case of death where it is not forbidden by law.”.

(K)

A provision as follows:

“LEGAL ACTIONS: No action at law or in equity shall be brought to recover on this policy prior to the expiration of 60 days after written proof of loss has been furnished in accordance with the requirements of this policy. No such action shall be brought after the expiration of 3 years after the time written proof of loss is required to be furnished.”.

(L)

(i)

A provision as follows:

“CHANGE OF BENEFICIARY: Unless the insured makes an irrevocable designation of beneficiary, the right to change of beneficiary is reserved to the insured and the consent of the beneficiary or beneficiaries shall not be requisite to surrender or assignment of this policy or to any change of beneficiary or beneficiaries, or to any other changes in this policy.”.

(ii)

The 1st clause of this provision, relating to the irrevocable designation of beneficiary, may be omitted at the insurer’s option.

(2)

Other provisions. —

Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, no such policy delivered or issued for delivery to any person in the District shall contain provisions respecting the matters set forth below unless such provisions are in the words in which the same appear in this paragraph; provided, however, that the insurer may, at its option, use in lieu of any such provision a corresponding provision of different wording approved by the Commissioner which is not less favorable in any respect to the insured or the beneficiary. Any such provision contained in the policy shall be preceded individually by the appropriate caption appearing in this paragraph or, at the option of the insurer, by such appropriate individual or group captions or subcaptions as the Commissioner may approve:

(A)

A provision as follows:

“CHANGE OF OCCUPATION: If the insured be injured or contract sickness after having changed his occupation to one classified by the insurer as more hazardous than that stated in this policy or while doing for compensation anything pertaining to an occupation so classified, the insurer will pay only such portion of the indemnities provided in this policy as the premium paid would have purchased at the rates and within the limits fixed by the insurer for such more hazardous occupation. If the insured changes his occupation to one classified by the insurer as less hazardous than that stated in this policy, the insurer, upon receipt of proof of such change of occupation, will reduce the premium rate accordingly, and will return the excess pro rata unearned premium from the date of change of occupation or from the policy anniversary date immediately preceding receipt of such proof, whichever is the more recent. In applying this provision, the classification of occupational risk and the premium rates shall be such as have been last filed by the insurer prior to the occurrence of the loss for which the insurer is liable or prior to date of proof of change in occupation with the official having supervision of insurance in the jurisdiction where the insured resided at the time this policy was issued; but if such filing was not required, then the classification of occupational risk and the premium rates shall be those last made effective by the insurer in such jurisdiction prior to the occurrence of the loss or prior to the date of proof of change in occupation.”.

(B)

A provision as follows:

“MISSTATEMENT OF AGE: If the age of the insured has been misstated, all amounts payable under this policy shall be such as the premium paid would have purchased at the correct age.”.

(C)

(i)

A provision as follows:

“OTHER INSURANCE IN THIS INSURER: If an accident or sickness or accident and sickness policy or policies previously issued by the insurer to the insured be in force concurrently herewith, making the aggregate indemnity for . . . . . . . . . . (insert type of coverage or coverages) in excess of $. . . . . . . . . . (insert maximum limit of indemnity or indemnities) the excess insurance shall be void and all premiums paid for such excess shall be returned to the insured or to his estate.”.

(ii)

Or, in lieu thereof: “Insurance effective at any one time on the insured under a like policy or policies in this insurer is limited to the one such policy elected by the insured, his beneficiary or his estate, as the case may be, and the insurer will return all premiums paid for all other such policies.”.

(D)

(i)

A provision as follows:

“INSURANCE WITH OTHER INSURERS: If there be other valid coverage, not with this insurer, providing benefits for the same loss on a provision of service basis or on an expense incurred basis and of which this insurer has not been given written notice prior to the occurrence or commencement of loss, the only liability under any expense incurred coverage of this policy shall be for such proportion of the loss as the amount which would otherwise have been payable hereunder plus the total of the like amounts under all such other valid coverages for the same loss of which this insurer had notice bears to the total like amounts under all valid coverages for such loss, and for the return of such portion of the premiums paid as shall exceed the pro rata portion for the amount so determined. For the purpose of applying this provision when other coverage is on a provision of service basis, the ‘like amount’ of such other coverage shall be taken as the amount which the services rendered would have cost in the absence of such coverage.”.

(ii)

If the foregoing policy provision is included in a policy which also contains the next following policy provision there shall be added to the caption of the foregoing provision the phrase “—EXPENSE INCURRED BENEFITS.” The insurer may, at its option, include in this provision a definition of “other valid coverage,” approved as to form by the Commissioner, which definition shall be limited in subject matter to coverage provided by organizations subject to regulation by insurance law or by insurance authorities of this or any other jurisdiction of the United States or any province of Canada, and by hospital or medical service organizations, and to any other coverage the inclusion of which may be approved by the Commissioner. In the absence of such definition such term shall not include group insurance, automobile medical payments insurance, or coverage provided by hospital or medical service organizations or by union welfare plans or employer or employee benefit organizations. For the purpose of applying the foregoing policy provision with respect to any insured, any amount of benefit provided for such insured pursuant to any compulsory benefit statute (including any workmen’s compensation or employer’s liability statute) whether provided by a governmental agency or otherwise shall in all cases be deemed to be “other valid coverage” of which the insurer has had notice. In applying the foregoing policy provision no 3rd party liability coverage shall be included as “other valid coverage.”

(E)

(i)

A provision as follows:

“INSURANCE WITH OTHER INSURERS: If there be other valid coverage, not with this insurer, providing benefits for the same loss on other than an expense-incurred basis and of which this insurer has not been given written notice prior to the occurrence or commencement of loss, the only liability for such benefits under this policy shall be for such proportion of the indemnities otherwise provided hereunder for such loss as the like indemnities of which the insurer had notice (including the indemnities under this policy) bear to the total amount of all like indemnities for such loss, and for the return of such portion of the premium paid as shall exceed the pro rata portion for the indemnities thus determined.”.

(ii)

If the foregoing policy provision is included in a policy which also contains the next preceding policy provision there shall be added to the caption of the foregoing provision the phrase “—OTHER BENEFITS.” The insurer may, at its option, include in this provision a definition of “other valid coverage,” approved as to form by the Commissioner, which definition shall be limited in subject matter to coverage provided by organizations subject to regulation by insurance law or by insurance authorities of this or any other jurisdiction of the United States or any province of Canada, and to any other coverage the inclusion of which may be approved by the Commissioner. In the absence of such definition such term shall not include group insurance, or benefits provided by union welfare plans or by employer or employee benefit organizations. For the purpose of applying the foregoing policy provision with respect to any insured, any amount of benefit provided for such insured pursuant to any compulsory benefit statute (including any workmen’s compensation or employer’s liability statute) whether provided by a governmental agency or otherwise shall in all cases be deemed to be “other valid coverage” of which the insurer has had notice. In applying the foregoing policy provision no 3rd-party liability coverage shall be included as “other valid coverage.”

(F)

(i)

A provision as follows:

“RELATION OF EARNINGS TO INSURANCE: If the total monthly amount of loss-of-time benefits promised for the same loss under all valid loss-of-time coverage upon the insured, whether payable on a weekly or monthly basis, shall exceed the monthly earnings of the insured at the time disability commenced or his average monthly earnings for the period of 2 years immediately preceding a disability for which claim is made, whichever is the greater, the insurer will be liable only for such proportionate amount of such benefits under this policy as the amount of such monthly earnings or such average monthly earnings of the insured bears to the total amount of monthly benefits for the same loss under all such coverage upon the insured at the time such disability commences and for the return of such part of the premiums paid during such 2 years as shall exceed the pro rata amount of the premiums for the benefits actually paid hereunder; but this shall not operate to reduce the total monthly amount of benefits payable under all such coverage upon the insured below the sum of $200 or the sum of the monthly benefits specified in such coverages, whichever is the lesser, nor shall it operate to reduce benefits other than those payable for loss of time.”.

(ii)

The foregoing policy provision may be inserted only in a policy which the insured has the right to continue in force subject to its terms by the timely payment of premiums until at least age 50 or in the case of a policy issued after age 44, for at least 5 years from its date of issue. The insurer may, at its option, include in this provision a definition of “valid loss-of-time coverage,” approved as to form by the Commissioner, which definition shall be limited in subject matter to coverage provided by governmental agencies or by organizations subject to regulation by insurance law or by insurance authorities of this or any other jurisdiction of the United States or any province of Canada, or to any other coverage the inclusion of which may be approved by the Commissioner or any combination of such coverages. In the absence of such definition such term shall not include any coverage provided for such insured pursuant to any compulsory benefit statute (including any workmen’s compensation or employer’s liability statute), or benefits provided by union welfare plans or by employer or employee benefit organizations;

(G)

A provision as follows:

“UNPAID PREMIUM: Upon the payment of a claim under this policy, any premium then due and unpaid or covered by any note or written order may be deducted therefrom.”.

(H)

A provision as follows:

“CANCELLATION: The insurer may cancel this policy at any time by written notice delivered to the insured, or mailed to his last address as shown by the records of the insurer, stating when, not less than 5 days thereafter, such cancellation shall be effective; and after the policy has been continued beyond its original term the insured may cancel this policy at any time by written notice delivered or mailed to the insurer, effective upon receipt or on such later date as may be specified in such notice. In the event of cancellation, the insurer will return promptly the unearned portion of any premium paid. If the insured cancels, the earned premium shall be computed by the use of the short-rate table last filed with the official having supervision of insurance in the jurisdiction where the insured resided when the policy was issued. If the insurer cancels, the earned premium shall be computed pro rata. Cancellation shall be without prejudice to any claim originating prior to the effective date of cancellation.”.

(I)

A provision as follows:

“CONFORMITY WITH STATE STATUTES: Any provision of this policy which, on its effective date, is in conflict with the statutes of the jurisdiction in which the insured resides on such date is hereby amended to conform to the minimum requirements of such statutes.”.

(J)

A provision as follows:

“ILLEGAL OCCUPATION: The insurer shall not be liable for any loss to which a contributing cause was the insured’s commission of or attempt to commit a felony or to which a contributing cause was the insured’s being engaged in an illegal occupation.”.

(K)

Repealed.

(3)

Inapplicable or inconsistent provisions. —

If any provision of this subsection is in whole or in part inapplicable to or inconsistent with the coverage provided by a particular form of policy the insurer, with the approval of the Commissioner, shall omit from such policy any inapplicable provision or part of a provision, and shall modify any inconsistent provision or part of the provision in such manner as to make the provision as contained in the policy consistent with the coverage provided by the policy.

(4)

Order. —

The provisions which are the subject of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, or any corresponding provisions which are used in lieu thereof in accordance with such paragraphs, shall be printed in the consecutive order of the provisions in such paragraphs or, at the option of the insurer, any such provision may appear as a unit in any part of the policy, with other provisions to which it may be logically related, provided the resulting policy shall not be in whole or in part unintelligible, uncertain, ambiguous, abstruse, or likely to mislead a person to whom the policy is offered, delivered, or issued.

(5)

Third-party rights. —

The word “insured,” as used in this section, shall not be construed as preventing a person other than the insured with a proper insurable interest from making application for and owning a policy covering the insured or from being entitled under such a policy to any indemnities, benefits, and rights provided therein.

(6)

Rules and regulations. —

The Council of the District of Columbia may make such reasonable rules and regulations concerning the procedure for the filing or submission of policies subject to this section as are necessary, proper or advisable to the administration of this section. This provision shall not abridge any other authority granted the Commissioner by law.

(d)

Conforming to statutory requirements. —

(1)

Provisions not subject to requirements. —

No policy provision which is not subject to subsection (c) of this section shall make a policy, or any portion thereof, less favorable in any respect to the insured or the beneficiary then the provisions thereof which are subject to this section.

(2)

Violations and conflicts. —

A policy delivered or issued for delivery to any person in the District in violation of this section shall be held valid but shall be construed as provided in this section. When any provision in a policy subject to this section is in conflict with any provision of this section, the rights, duties, and obligations of the insurer, the insured, and the beneficiary shall be governed by the provisions of this section.

(e)

Applications. —

(1)

The insured shall not be bound by any statement made in an application for a policy unless a copy of such application is attached to or endorsed on the policy when issued as a part thereof. If any such policy delivered or issued for delivery to any person in the District shall be reinstated or renewed, and the insured or the beneficiary or assignee of such policy shall make written request to the insurer for a copy of the application, if any, for such reinstatement or renewal, the insurer shall, within 15 days after the receipt of such request at its home office or any branch office of the insurer, deliver or mail to the person making such request, a copy of such application. If such copy shall not be so delivered or mailed, the insurer shall be precluded from introducing such application as evidence in any action or proceeding based upon or involving such policy or its reinstatement or renewal.

(2)

No alteration of any written application for any such policy shall be made by any person other than the applicant without his written consent, except that insertions may be made by the insurer, for administrative purposes only, in such manner as to indicate clearly that such insertions are not to be ascribed to the applicant.

(3)

The falsity of any statement in the application for any policy covered by this section may not bar the right to recovery thereunder unless such false statement materially affected either the acceptance of the risk or the hazard assumed by the insurer.

(f)

Waiver of insurer’s rights. —

The acknowledgment by any insurer of the receipt of notice given under any policy covered by this section, or the furnishing of forms for filing proofs of loss, or the acceptance of such proofs, or the investigation of any claim thereunder shall not operate as a waiver of any of the rights of the insurer in defense of any claim arising under such policy.

(g)

Limitations on coverage. —

If any such policy contains a provision establishing, as an age limit or otherwise, a date after which the coverage provided by the policy will not be effective, and if such date falls within a period for which premium is accepted by the insurer or if the insurer accepts a premium after such date, the coverage provided by the policy will continue in force subject to any right of cancellation until the end of the period for which premium has been accepted. In the event the age of the insured has been misstated and if, according to the correct age of the insured, the coverage provided by the policy would not have become effective, or would have ceased prior to the acceptance of such premium or premiums, then the liability of the insurer shall be limited to the refund, upon request, of all premiums paid for the period not covered by the policy.

(h)

Exceptions. —

Except as provided in § 31-4724, nothing in this section shall apply to or affect:

(1)

Repealed.

(2)

Life insurance, endowment or annuity contracts, or contracts supplemental thereto which contain only such provisions relating to accident and sickness insurance as:

(A)

Provide additional benefits in case of death or dismemberment or loss of sight by accident; or

(B)

Operate to safeguard such contracts against lapse, or to give a special surrender value or special benefit or an annuity in the event that the insured or annuitant shall come to have a total and permanent disability, as defined by the contract or supplemental contract; provided, that no such supplemental contract shall be issued or delivered to any person in the District unless and until a copy of the form thereof has been submitted to and approved by the Commissioner under such reasonable rules and regulations as the Council of the District of Columbia shall make concerning the provisions in such contracts and their submission to and approval by him.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1166, ch. 672, ch. V, § 12
July 12, 1950, 64 Stat. 335, ch. 457, § 3
July 16, 1953, 67 Stat. 162, ch. 196, § 1
Feb. 19, 1976, D.C. Law 1-46, § 2, 22 DCR 4680
Feb. 11, 1982, D.C. Law 4-66, § 2(a), 28 DCR 5040
Aug. 25, 1994, D.C. Law 10-158, § 2, 41 DCR 4881
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 36, 43 DCR 530
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(j), 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 23(d), 45 DCR 745
Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-247, § 2, 54 DCR 620
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 43, 53 DCR 6198
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 28(c), 55 DCR 6758
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 199, 56 DCR 1117
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-360, § 504, 58 DCR 896
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-265, § 106, 62 DCR 1529

History

Health and accident companies, see § 31-5202.
Health and accident policies issued by companies operating under Fire and Casualty Act, see § 31-2502.28.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 31-2502.28.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 35-517.
1973 Ed., § 35-712.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 16-247 repealed subsec. (c)(2)(K) which had read as follows: “(K) A provision as follows: LEGAL ACTIONS: No action at law or in equity shall be brought to recover on this policy prior to the expiration of 60 days after written proof of loss has been furnished in accordance with the requirements of this policy. No such action shall be brought after the expiration of 3 years after the time written proof of loss is required to be furnished.”
D.C. Law 16-305, in subsec. (c)(1)(B)(iii), substituted “has a disability” for “is disabled”; and in subsec. (h)(2)(B), substituted “have a total and permanent disability” for “become totally and permanently disabled”.
D.C. Law 17-231, in subsecs. (b)(1)(C), substituted “spouse, domestic partner” for “husband, wife”; and, in subsec. (c)(1)(I)(ii), substituted “marriage or domestic partnership” for “marriage”.
D.C. Law 17-353, in subsec. (h)(2)(B), substituted “come to have a total” for “have a total”.
D.C. Law 18-360, in subsec. (a), rewrote the last sentence which had read as follows: “The action of the Commissioner in this regard shall be subject to appeal and review in the form and manner prescribed in § 31-4327.”; and repealed subsec. (h)(1), which formerly read:
“(1) Any policy of group accident, group health, or group accident and health insurance; or”
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-265 rewrote (c)(1)(C)(i).

Effect of Amendments

Section 31-4327, referred to in subsection (a) of this section, was repealed by D.C. Law 11-227, § 16, effective April 9, 1997.

References in Text

Editor's Notes

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-4701.

Section 4 of D.C. Law 16-247 provided: “This act shall apply to all individual and group health benefit plans delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on the first day of the month beginning on or after 90 days after the effective date of this act.”

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(276) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government